West Virginia, session 2025, SB340.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. State Police. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 28, 2024, authorized under the authority of §15-2-5 of this code, modified by the State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 1, 2024, relating to the State Police (West Virginia State Police Career Progression System, 81 CSR 03), is authorized.